Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.003

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a strong system for the exclusion of plant and bee pests and diseases through regulation of movement and quarantines of infested areas to protect the forest, agricultural, horticultural, floricultural, and apiary industries of the state; plants and shrubs within the state; and the environment of the state from the impact of insect pests, plant pathogens, noxious weeds, and bee pests and the public and private costs that result when these infestations become established.

[ 1991 c 257 s 3.]